Vermont, session 2025-2026, S170.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. NET METERING RATE ORDERS
The Public Utility Commission shall not adopt new renewable energy credit
adjustors or siting adjustors prior to the 2028 Biennial Update required by Rule
5.100.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385845 v.2